Arkansas, session 2025, HB1378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-3-701(b), concerning the State Board of
Finance, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The board shall be composed of the following members:
(1) The Governor or his or her designee;
(2) The Treasurer of State;
(3) The Auditor of State;
(4) The Bank Commissioner;
(5) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration;
(6) The Securities Commissioner Secretary of the Department of
*JLL114*
02/02/2025 4:44:12 PM JLL114

HB1378
Transformation and Shared Services;
(7) One (1) person with knowledge and experience in commercial
banking;
(8) One (1) person who:
(A) Holds or has held a Series 7 licensure as a general
securities representative; and
(B) Has at least five (5) years of experience as a general
securities representative;
(9) One (1) certified public accountant who:
(A) Is licensed in Arkansas; and
(B) Has at least five (5) years of experience as a
certified public accountant;
(10) One (1) member of the general public; and
(11)(A) The Insurance Commissioner.
(B) The Insurance Commissioner shall be a voting member
only for the purpose of voting on health benefit plans.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-3-703(b)(1), concerning meetings of the
State Board of Finance, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Seven (7) Six (6) members shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 19-3-704(b), concerning the powers and
duties of the State Board of Finance, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The board shall select the chief compliance officer within the
Treasurer of State's office based upon nominations received from the
Treasurer of State.
(2) The chief compliance officer shall:
(A) Be employed by the board;
(B) Work with and at the direction of the Treasurer of
State consistent with the policies and directives of the board; and
(C) Serve at the pleasure of the board.




02/02/2025 4:44:12 PM JLL114